Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202568-2304
Home visitation program; evidence-based; requirements for funding.

The department shall only fund an evidence-based home visitation program. An evidence-based home visitation program:

(1) Is founded on a clear, consistent program model;

(2) Is associated with, or certified by, a national organization, an institution of higher education, or a national or state public health institute;

(3) Has comprehensive home visitation standards that ensure high quality service delivery and continuous quality improvement;

(4) Follows a program manual or design that specifies the purpose, outcomes, duration, and frequency of service;

(5) Employs well-trained and culturally competent staff;

(6) Provides continual professional development relevant to the specific program model being delivered;

(7) Demonstrates strong links to other community-based services;

(8) Operates within an organization that ensures compliance with home visitation standards; and

(9) Operates with fidelity to the program model.

Laws 2025, LB22, § 4.